Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2706
Eligibility for grant; grant application; award; preference.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section for a city of the primary class, any municipality that has applied for and received a grant of assistance under the Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act shall not receive state assistance under the Civic and Community Center Financing Act for the same project for which the grant was awarded under the Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act.

(2) A city of the primary class shall not be eligible to receive a grant of assistance from the Civic and Community Center Financing Act if the city has applied for and received a grant of assistance under the Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act.

(3) Any city that has received funding under the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act shall not receive state assistance under the Civic and Community Center Financing Act.

(4) From July 1, 2027, to June 30, 2028, a municipality shall be eligible for a grant of assistance under the Civic and Community Center Financing Act only if such municipality is not prohibited from receiving a grant of assistance under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section. In awarding grants of assistance, the department shall give preference to any municipality that is partnered with a certified creative district. Notwithstanding the limitations on the amount of grants of assistance in section 13-2705, the department may award grants of assistance to qualifying municipalities in amounts set by the Nebraska Arts Council, which shall not be less than one hundred thousand dollars. The department shall coordinate with the Nebraska Arts Council for purposes of setting such amounts. For purposes of this subsection, certified creative district means a creative district certified pursuant to subdivision (5) of section 82-312. After June 30, 2028, this subsection no longer applies.

(5) Any municipality eligible for a grant of assistance as provided in this section may apply for a grant of assistance from the fund. Any tribal government may apply for a grant of assistance from the fund. Application shall be made on forms developed by the department.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 18;

Laws 2003, LB 385, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB551, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB779, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB426, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB927, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 24;

Laws 2026, LB778, § 1.
July 18, 2026
Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act, see section 13-2601.

Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act, see section 13-3101.